Tennessee, session 114, HB1819.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 55-10-101(b)(2)(A), is amended by
deleting the subdivision and substituting:
(A) It is a Class E felony for any person to fail to stop or comply with the
requirements of subsection (a) when the person knew or should reasonably have known
that death resulted from the accident. In addition to any other punishment that may be
imposed for a violation of this subdivision (b)(2)(A), the defendant shall be punished by
confinement for not less than one (1) year and a minimum fine of ten thousand dollars
($10,000).
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it, and
applies to offenses committed on or after that date.
HB1819
010777
- 1 -